Hawaii statutes.
PART III.
HAWAII BRANCHES OF OUT-OF-STATE FOREIGN BANKS

[§412:13-300] Purposes. This part is
generally intended to ensure that interstate state branches of out-of-state
foreign banks may be established and operated in this State:

(1) To the extent consistent with the provisions of
section 5 of the federal International Banking Act; and

(2) Under terms and conditions that are generally
comparable to and no less favorable than those applicable to, the establishment
of interstate federal branches in this State by out-of-state foreign banks. [L
1996, c 155, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next